Tennessee, session 114, SB1915.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-58-102, is amended by adding the
following as a new subdivision:
( ) "Local governmental entity" means a county, including a county with a
metropolitan or charter form of government, and an incorporated city or town;
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-58-103(a)(1), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting instead:
(1) Except where prohibited by federal law, every state governmental entity,
local governmental entity, and local health department shall verify, in the manner
provided in this chapter, that each applicant who is eighteen (18) years of age or older
and applies for a federal, state, or local public benefit from the state governmental entity,
local governmental entity, or local health department is a United States citizen or lawfully
present in the United States pursuant to the federal Immigration and Nationality Act (8
U.S.C. § 1101 et seq.).
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-58-103(b)(1), is amended by
deleting the language "every state governmental entity or local health department" and
substituting instead "every state governmental entity, local governmental entity, or local health
department".
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-58-103(b), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
SB1915
011380
- 1 -

(3) With respect to local governmental entity, subdivision (b)(1) must be
implemented upon the local governmental entity's first reprinting of applicable forms or
updating of the electronic or automated phone systems, described in subdivision (b)(1),
after July 1, 2026.
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-58-103(c), is amended by deleting
the language "entity or local health department" and substituting instead "state governmental
entity, local governmental entity, or local health department".
SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-58-103(d), is amended by deleting
the language "entity or local health department" wherever it appears and substituting instead
"state governmental entity, local governmental entity, or local health department".
SECTION 7. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-58-103, is amended by deleting
subdivisions (e) and (f) and substituting instead:
(e) Each state governmental entity, local governmental entity, or local health
department shall maintain a copy of all documentation submitted by an applicant for
verification in a manner consistent with the state governmental entity's, local
governmental entity's, or local health department's rules, regulations, or policies
governing storage or preservation of such documentation.
(f)
(1) Any document submitted pursuant to subsection (c) or (d) is
presumed to be proof of an individual's eligibility under this chapter until a final
verification is received by the state governmental entity, local governmental
entity, or local health department, and no state governmental entity, local
governmental entity, or local health department shall delay the distribution of any
federal, state, or local benefit based solely on the pendency of final verification.
- 2 - 011380

(2) Upon receipt of a final verification that indicates that the applicant is
not a United States citizen or qualified alien, the state governmental entity, local
governmental entity, or local health department shall terminate any recurring
benefit, and shall pursue any action applicable against the applicant pursuant to
§ 4-58-104 or § 4-58-105.
SECTION 8. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-58-104, is amended by deleting
subsections (b)-(d) and substituting instead:
(b) Any natural person who conspires to defraud a state governmental entity,
local governmental entity, or any local health department by securing a false claim
allowed or paid to another person in violation of this chapter is liable under § 4-18-
103(a)(3).
(c) A state governmental entity, local governmental entity, or local health
department shall file with the attorney general and reporter of this state a complaint
alleging a violation of subsection (a) or (b), as applicable.
(d) Any moneys collected pursuant to this section must be deposited with and
utilized by the applicable state governmental entity, local governmental entity, or local
health department that filed a complaint pursuant to subsection (c). The applicable
entity, local governmental entity, or local health department shall establish a fund for the
deposit of such moneys, and shall use such moneys for the sole purpose of enforcing
this chapter. Any interest accruing on investments and deposits of the fund must be
credited to such fund, must not revert to any general fund, and must be carried forward
into each subsequent fiscal year.
SECTION 9. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-58-105, is amended by deleting the
language "state governmental entity or local health department" and substituting instead "state
governmental entity, local governmental entity, or local health department".
- 3 - 011380

SECTION 10. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-58-106(a), is amended by
deleting the language "state governmental entity or local health department" and substituting
instead "state governmental entity, local governmental entity, or local health department".
SECTION 11. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-58-106(b), is amended by
deleting the subsection.
SECTION 12. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-58-107, is amended by deleting
the language "state governmental entity or local health department" and substituting instead
"state governmental entity, local governmental entity, or local health department".
SECTION 13. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-58-109, is amended by deleting
the language "state governmental entity or local health department" and substituting instead
"state governmental entity, local governmental entity, or local health department".
SECTION 14. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 58, is amended by adding
the following as new sections:
4-58-111.
(a) The attorney general and reporter may investigate each credible allegation or
complaint that a local governmental entity or local health department is in violation of this
part.
(b) If the attorney general and reporter concludes that a local governmental
entity or local health department has violated this part, the attorney general and reporter
may proceed to enforce compliance with this part by taking action in accordance with §
4-1-429 to withhold all funds of this state allocated to the local governmental entity or
local health department via grant, contract, or statute, including, but not limited to, state-
shared taxes.
4-58-112.
- 4 - 011380

(a) Each state governmental entity, local governmental entity, and local health
department shall submit monthly reports to the general assembly, the department of
finance and administration, and the centralized immigration enforcement division of the
department of safety, created in § 4-3-2014, of:
(1) The number of individuals who applied for a public benefit and were
determined upon receipt of a final verification not to be a United States citizen or
qualified alien and all information about such applicants; and
(2) The number of individuals for whom a final verification was received
indicating that the individual is not a United States citizen or qualified alien and
for whom the entity or department terminates a recurring benefit.
(b)
(1) Each state governmental entity, local governmental entity, and local
health department shall report individuals who are not United States citizens or
qualified aliens and who receive public benefits from the state governmental
entity, local governmental entity, or local health department to the centralized
immigration enforcement division.
(2) An employee's or official's failure to report in violation of subdivision
(b)(1) is a Class A misdemeanor.
SECTION 15. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 5 - 011380